Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2760.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state match advantage for rural transportation fund The sum of $15,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state match advantage for rural transportation fund established by section 28-339, Arizona Revised Statutes.